zh-CN: 预期应用: 储物柜; 天花板; 混凝土; 露台/围栏; 门; 干壁; 外墙; 地板; 家具; 内墙; 海运; 金属; 塑料; 散热器; 装饰/成型; 窗; 木头; 其他
sv: Avsedd användning: Skåp; Tak; Betong; Däck/staket; Dörrar; Gipsvägg; Ytterväggar; Golv; Möbler; Innerväggar; Sjötransport; Metall; Plast; Radiatorer; Listverk/gjutlister; Fönster; Trä; Annat
ja: 対象用途: キャビネット; 天井; コンクリート; デッキ/フェンス; ドア; 乾式壁; 外壁; 床; 家具; 内壁; 海上輸送; 金属; プラスチック; ラジエーター; トリム/モールディング; 窓; 木材; その他
tr: İstenen başvuru: Dolaplar; Tavanlar; Beton; Güverteler/Çitler; Kapılar; Alçı Panel; Dış duvarlar; Zeminler; Mobilyalar; İç duvarlar; Deniz taşımacılığı; Metal; Plastik; Radyatörler; Süs/Pervaz; Pencereler; Ahşap; Diğer
nl: Beoogde toepassing: Kasten; Plafonds; Beton; Dekken/hekken; Deuren; Gipsplaat; Buitenmuren; Vloeren; Meubelen; Binnenmuren; Zeevervoer; Metaal; Plastic; Radiatoren; Trimmen/lijstwerk; Ramen; Hout; Andere
el: Προβλεπόμενη εφαρμογή: Ντουλάπια; Ταβάνια; Σκυρόδεμα; Δάπεδα εξωτερικού χώρου/Περιφράξεις; Πόρτες; Γυψοσανίδα; Εξωτερικοί τοίχοι; Δάπεδα; Έπιπλα; Εσωτερικοί τοίχοι; Θαλάσσιες μεταφορές; Μέταλλο; Πλαστικό; Καλοριφέρ; Περικοπή/Διαμόρφωση; Παράθυρα; Ξύλο; Άλλο
sl-SI: Predvidena uporaba: Omarice; Stropi; Beton; Terasa/Ograje; Vrata; Mavčna plošča; Zunanje stene; Tla; Pohištvo; Notranje stene; Pomorski promet; Kovina; Plastika; Radiatorji; Obrobe/letve; Okna; Les; Drugo
ro-RO: Destinație de utilizare: Dulapuri; Plafoane; Beton; Platforme/Garduri; Uși; Gips-carton; Pereți exteriori; Podele; Mobilier; Pereții interiori; Transport maritim; Metal; Plastic; Radiatoare; Ornamente/modelare; Ferestre; Lemn; Altele
pt-PT: Aplicação pretendida: Armários; Tetos; Betão; Terraços/cercas; Portas; Pladur; Paredes exteriores; Pisos; Mobiliário; Paredes interiores; Transporte marítimo; Metal; Plástico; Radiadores; Friso/Moldagem; Janelas; Madeira; Outro
vi: Ứng dụng dự định: Tủ; Trần nhà; Bê tông; Sàn/Hàng rào; Cửa; Tường khô; Tường bên ngoài; Tầng; Đồ nội thất; Tường trong nhà; Vận tải biển; Kim loại; Nhựa; Bộ tản nhiệt; Cắt/Đúc; Cửa sổ; Gỗ; Khác
zh-TW: 預期應用: 櫥櫃; 天花板; 實心; 露天平臺/柵欄; 門; 隔間牆; 外牆; 樓層; 家具; 內牆; 海運; 金屬; 塑膠; 散熱器; 裝飾/造模; 窗; 木材; 其他
ko: 사용 목적: 캐비닛; 천장; 콘크리트; 테라스/울타리; 문; 석고벽; 외벽; 바닥; 가구; 내벽; 해상 운송; 금속; 플라스틱; 라디에이터; 트림/몰딩; 창; 목재; 기타
it: Applicazione prevista: Armadietti; Soffitti; Calcestruzzo; Ponti/recinzioni; Porte; Muro a secco; Mura esterne; Pavimenti; Arredamento; Pareti interne; Trasporto marittimo; Metallo; Plastica; Radiatori; Rifinitura/modellatura; Windows; Legno; Altro
de: Vorgesehene Anwendung: Schränke; Zimmerdecken; Beton; Verandas/Zäune; Türen; Gipskarton; Außenwände; Böden; Möbel; Innenwände; Seetransport; Metall; Kunststoff; Heizkörper; Verzierung/Stuck; Fenster; Holz; Sonstiges
th: การใช้งานที่ตั้งใจไว้: ตู้; เพดาน; คอนกรีต; ดาดฟ้า/รั้ว; ประตู; ผนังยิปซัม; ผนังภายนอก; พื้น; เฟอร์นิเจอร์; ผนังภายใน; การขนส่งทางทะเล; โลหะ; พลาสติก; หม้อน้ำกระจายความร้อน; การตัดแต่ง/การเสริมแต่งขอบ; หน้าต่าง; ไม้; อื่นๆ
en: Intended application: Cabinets; Ceilings; Concrete; Decks/Fences; Doors; Drywall; Exterior walls; Floors; Furniture; Interior walls; Marine transport; Metal; Plastic; Radiators; Trim/Molding; Windows; Wood; Other
fr: Application prévue: Placards; Plafonds; Béton; Terrasses/clôtures; Portes; Plaques de plâtre; Murs extérieurs; Sols; Meubles; Murs intérieurs; Transport maritime; Métal; Plastique; Radiateurs; Garniture/moulure; Fenêtres; Bois; Autre
pl: Docelowe zastosowanie: Szafki; Sufity; Beton; Tarasy/ogrodzenia; Drzwi; Płyta gipsowa; Ściany zewnętrzne; Podłogi; Meble; Ściany wewnętrzne; Transport morski; Metal; Tworzywo sztuczne; Kaloryfery; Przycinanie/formowanie; Okna; Drewno; Pozostałe
cs: Zamýšlené použití: Skříňky; Stropy; Beton; Paluby/ploty; Dveře; Sádrokarton; Vnější stěny; Podlahy; Nábytek; Vnitřní stěny; Námořní doprava; Kov; Plast; Radiátory; Oříznutí/tvarování; Okna; Dřevo; Jiné
pt-BR: Aplicação pretendida: Gabinetes; Tetos; Concreto; Deques/Cercas; Portas; Parede de gesso; Paredes externas; Pisos; Móveis; Paredes internas; Transporte marítimo; Metal; Plástico; Radiadores; Acabamento/Moldagem; Janelas; Madeira; Outro
hu: Tervezett használat: Szekrény; Mennyezet; Beton; Fedélzet/kerítés; Ajtó; Gipszkarton; Külső fal; Padló; Bútor; Belső fal; Tengeri szállítás; Fém; Műanyag; Radiátor; Díszléc/szegélyléc; Ablak; Fa; Egyéb
fi: Tarkoitettu käyttökohde: Kaapit; Sisäkatot; Betoni; Terassit/aidat; Ovet; Kipsilevy; Ulkoseinät; Lattiat; Huonekalut; Sisäseinät; Merikuljetukset; Metalli; Muovi; Patterit; Leikkaus/muovaus; Ikkunat; Puu; Muu
lt-LT: Paskirtis: Spintelės; Lubos; Betonas; Terasos / tvoros; Durys; Gipso kartonas; Išorinės sienos; Grindys; Baldai; Vidinės sienos; Jūrų transportas; Metalas; Plastikas; Radiatoriai; Apvadai / dekoro elementai; Langai; Mediena; Kita
es: Aplicación prevista: Armarios; Techos; Hormigón; Cubiertas/cercas; Puertas; Placa de yeso; Paredes exteriores; Pisos; Mobiliario; Paredes interiores; Transporte marítimo; Metal; Plástico; Radiadores; Recorte/Moldura; Ventanas; Madera; Otros
sk-SK: Zamýšľané použitie: Skrine; Stropy; Betón; Paluby/ploty; Dvere; Sadrokartónové dosky; Vonkajšie steny; Podlahy; Nábytok; Vnútorné steny; Námorná doprava; Kov; Plast; Radiátory; Orezanie/tvarovanie; Windows; Drevo; Iné
nb: Tiltenkt bruk: Skap; Himling; Betong; Dekk/gjerder; Dører; Gips; Yttervegger; Gulv; Møbler; Innervegger; Sjøtransport; Metall; Plast; Radiatorer; Listverk/støping; Vinduer; Trevirke; Annen
hr-HR: Predviđena primjena: Ormarići; Stropovi; Beton; Palube/ograde; Vrata; Gips-kartonske ploče; Vanjski zidovi; Podovi; Namještaj; Unutarnji zidovi; Pomorski prijevoz; Metal; Plastika; Radijatori; Obrub/lajsna; Prozori; Drvo; Ostalo
ru: Применение: Шкафы; Потолки; Бетон; Террасы/заборы; Двери; Гипсокартон; Внешние стены; Полы; Мебель; Внутренние стены; Морской транспорт; Металл; Пластик; Радиаторы; Отделка/молдинг; Окна; Дерево; Другое
bg-BG: Предвидено приложение: Шкафове; Тавани; Бетон; Палуби/огради; Врати; Гипсокартон; Външни стени; Подове; Мебели; Вътрешни стени; Морски транспорт; Метал; Пластмаса; Радиатори; Облицовка/формоване; Прозорци; Дърво; Други
da: Tiltænkt anvendelse: Skabe; Lofter; Beton; Dæk/hegn; Døre; Gipsplader; Ydervægge; Gulve; Møbler; Indvendige vægge; Søtransport; Metal; Plast; Radiatorer; Trim/støbning; Vinduer; Træ; Andet